apertium-eu-hu.hu.lexc
!##############################################################################

Multichar_Symbols

+N +Po +Det +Pron +CC +CS
+Nom +Acc +Dat +Ins +Caus +Tra +Term +Ess1 +Ess2 +Ine +SEss +Ade +Ill +Sub +All +Ela +Del +Abl +Gen +Form +Dist +Soc +Loc +DTemp +Temp
+Pl 
+Sg1 +Sg2 +Sg3 +Pl1 +Pl2 +Pl3
+PxSg +PxPl
+PxSg1 +PxSg2 +PxSg3 +PxPl1 +PxPl2 +PxPl3
+Dem +Pers +Recip +Rel +Def +Indef
+Use/LR +Use/RL

{^oa} {^f} {^b} {^v}

!##############################################################################

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;
Pronouns ;
Determiners ;
Conjunctions ;

!##############################################################################
! 
! 0      I      II       III          IV                 V
! Stem + Num. + Poss. + (Nom. poss. + Nom. poss. num.) + Case
! ház                                                            'ház'
! ház    ak                                                      'házak'
! ház    ak              é            i                  ban     'házakéiban'
! ház           am
! ház           am       é                                
! ház           am       é                               ban     'házaméban' 
! ház           am       é            i
! ház    ai     m        
!
!##############################################################################

LEXICON Cases1 ! "ház" , back vowel

+Nom: # ;
+Acc:%>at #  ;
+Ill:%>ba #  ;
+Ine:%>ban #  ;
+Ela:%>ból #  ;
+Sub:%>ra #  ;
+SEss:%>on #  ;
+Del:%>ról #  ;
+All:%>hoz #  ;
+Ade:%>nál #  ;
+Abl:%>tól #  ;
+Dat:%>nak #  ;
+Ins:%>val #  ;
+Tra:%>vá #  ;
+Caus:%>ért # ;
+Ess1:%>ként # ;
+Term:%>ig # ;
+Dist:%>{^oa}nként # ;
+Temp:%>kor # ;
+DTemp:%>onta # ;
+Soc:%>{^oa}stul # ;

LEXICON Poss1

Cases1 ; 
+PxSg:é Cases1 ;
+PxPl:éi Cases1 ; 

LEXICON PossAttr1

Poss1 ;
+PxSg1:%>m Poss1 ;
+PxSg2:%>d Poss1 ;
+PxSg3:%>ja Poss1 ;
+PxPl1:%>nk Poss1 ;
+PxPl2:%>tok Poss1 ;
+PxPl3:%>juk Poss1 ;

LEXICON Cases

+Nom: # ;
+Acc:%>t #  ;
+Dat:%>nek #  ;
+Caus:%>ért # ;
+Term:%>ig # ;
+Ess1:%>ként # ;
+Form:%>képp # ;
+Form+Use/LR:%>képpen # ;

!##############################################################################

LEXICON Nreg3 ! "ház" ::: low back

+N: PossAttr1 ;
+N+Pl:%>ak Cases1 ;
+N+Pl:%>ai PossAttr1 ;

LEXICON Nreg

+N: Cases ;
+N+Pl:%>{^v}k Cases ;

LEXICON Nreg1 ! "asztal" ::: C_final, non_low back

+N: Cases ;
+N+Pl:%>ok Cases ;

LEXICON Nreg2 ! "nő" ::: V_final, non_low

+N: Cases ;
+N+Pl:%>k Cases ;

LEXICON Nreg4 ! "elv" ::: low front

+N: Cases ;
+N+Pl:%>ek Cases ;

LEXICON Nreg5 ! "élet" ::: C_final, non_low front non_round

+N: Cases ;
+N+Pl:%>ek Cases ;

LEXICON Nreg6 ! "gyök" ::: C_final, non_low front round

+N: Cases ;
+N+Pl:%>ök Cases ;

!##############################################################################

LEXICON CC

+CC: # ;

LEXICON CS

+CS: # ;

LEXICON Conjunctions 

és CC "and";
meg CC "and";
de CC "but";
vagy CC "or";

!##############################################################################

LEXICON Determiners 

a+Det+Def+Use/RL:%~a # ;
a+Det+Def+Use/LR:a # ;
a+Det+Def+Use/LR:az # ;

egy+Det+Indef:egy # ;


!##############################################################################

LEXICON Pronouns

én+Pron+Pers+Sg1:én Cases ;
te+Pron+Pers+Sg2:te Cases ;
ön+Pron+Pers+Sg2:ön Cases ;
maga+Pron+Pers+Sg2:maga Cases ;
ő+Pron+Pers+Sg3:ő Cases ;
mi+Pron+Pers+Pl1:mi Cases ;
ti+Pron+Pers+Pl2:ti Cases ;
önök+Pron+Pers+Pl2:önök Cases ;
magak+Pron+Pers+Pl2:magak Cases ;
ők+Pron+Pers+Pl3:ők Cases ;

ez+Pron+Dem:ez Cases ;
ez+Pron+Dem+Pl:ezek Cases ; 
az+Pron+Dem:az Cases ; 
az+Pron+Dem+Pl:azok Cases ; 

egymás+Pron+Recip:egymás Cases ; 

aki+Pron+Rel:aki Cases ; 
aki+Pron+Rel+Pl:akik Cases ; 

!##############################################################################

LEXICON Nouns

lakás Nreg  "flat" ;
lámpa Nreg  "lamp" ;
táska Nreg  "bag" ;
csésze Nreg  "cup" ;
lecke Nreg  "lesson" ;

asztal Nreg1 "table" ;
nő Nreg2  "woman" ;
tű Nreg2  "needle" ;
kocsi Nreg2  "car" ;
hajó Nreg2  "boat" ;
kapu Nreg2  "gate" ;

ház Nreg3   "house"  ;
